District of Columbia statutes.
5-634

Medical leave for non-performance-of-duty illnesses and injuries; referral for disability retirement.

(a)

If the Director, in consultation with the Police and Fire Clinic physicians, determines that a member can neither perform the full range of duties nor work in a limited-duty status due to a non-performance-of-duty injury or illness, the member shall be entitled to chargeable medical leave to the extent the member has leave in his or her sick leave and annual leave accounts, and in accordance with rules established by the Mayor under Chapter 6 of Title 1 and Chapter 5 of Title 32.

(b)

If at any time the Director, in consultation with the Police and Fire Clinic physicians, determines that a member who has sustained a non-performance-of-duty injury or illness will not be able to perform the full range of duties after achieving maximum medical improvement, the Director shall recommend the member for retirement pursuant to § 5-709.

(c)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, and regardless of whether the prognosis is that the member who has sustained a non-performance-of-duty injury or illness will be able to perform a full range of duties after achieving maximum medical improvement, the Director shall process for retirement pursuant to § 5-709, those Metropolitan Police Department members who spend all or part of 172 cumulative work days in a less-than-full-duty status over any 2-year period as a result of any one non-performance-of-duty injury or illness, including any complications relating to the injury or illness.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, and regardless of whether the prognosis is that the member who has sustained a non-performance-of-duty injury or illness will be able to perform the full range of duties after achieving maximum medical improvement, the Director shall process for retirement pursuant to § 5-709, those Fire and Emergency Medical Services members who spend 64 cumulative work days in a less-than-full-duty status over any 2-year period as a result of any one non-performance-of-duty injury or illness, including any complications relating to the injury or illness.

(e)

The provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of this section shall not apply to members who are unable to perform a full range of duties as a result of pregnancy.

History

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 624, 51 DCR 9406